District of Columbia statutes.
7-831

Purpose.

It is the purpose of this legislation to provide for the early identification of certain metabolic disorders in newborns in the District of Columbia so that referral and treatment, where appropriate, may be provided.

History

Apr. 29, 1980, D.C. Law 3-65, § 2, 27 DCR 1087

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-311.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 3-65, the “D.C. Newborn Screening Requirement Act of 1979”, see Mayor’s Order 99-88, June 2, 1999 ( 46 DCR 5721).